Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.320

Warehouse receipts—Lost or destroyed receipts.

In case any warehouse receipt issued by a licensee shall be lost or destroyed, the owner thereof shall be entitled to a duplicate receipt from the licensee upon executing and delivering to the warehouse operator issuing such receipt, a bond in double the value of the commodity covered by such lost receipt, with good and sufficient surety to indemnify the warehouse operator against any loss sustained by reason of the issuance of such duplicate receipt, and such duplicate receipt shall state that it is issued in lieu of the former receipt, giving the number and date thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 621; 1963 c 124 s 32.]